Hawaii statutes.
§334-122 Definitions. For the purposes
of this part:

"Assisted community treatment" [Repeal
and reenactment on July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] includes medication
specifically authorized by court order; individual or group therapy; day or
partial day programming activities; services and training, including
educational and vocational activities; supervision of living arrangements; and
any other services prescribed to either alleviate the person's disorder or
disability, maintain or maximize semi-independent functioning, or prevent
further deterioration that may reasonably be predicted to result in the need
for hospitalization or more intensive or restrictive levels of care in the
community or incarceration for criminal behavior.

"Designated mental health program" [Definition
repealed July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] includes a state-operated or
private provider who is authorized to provide mental health services, including
but not limited to inpatient treatment, outpatient treatment, case management,
day treatment, or crisis services.

"Interested party" [Definition repealed
July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] means a parent, grandparent, spouse,
sibling, adult child, reciprocal beneficiary, service provider, case manager,
outreach worker, or mental health professional.

"Outpatient treatment psychiatrist".
REPEALED. [Reenacted on July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.]

"Subject of the order" [Repeal and
reenactment on July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] means a person who has
been ordered by the court to obtain assisted community treatment.

"Subject of the petition" [Repeal
and reenactment on July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] means the person
who, under a petition filed under section 334-123, is alleged to meet the
criteria for assisted community treatment.

"Treating psychiatrist" [Definition
repealed July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] means the psychiatrist who is
responsible for the management and supervision of a person's treatment under
order of the court. [L 1984, c 251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §8]

Note

Definition of "outpatient treatment" changed to
"assisted community treatment". L 2013, c 221, §8.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next